Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-104] Charges for prior services by
counties to authority. Every county (including departments, boards, or
instrumentalities thereof) which has, prior to May 14, 1949, provided or
furnished any facilities, services, or privileges, including, without
limitation to the generality of the foregoing, garbage and trash collection and
disposal, use of streets or highways, and use of county incinerators or garbage
dumps, to the authority or its predecessors in interest in regard to any public
housing project or complex owned, operated, or administered by the authority
under any law or laws, or to the tenants or occupants of the public housing
project or complex, for which facilities, services, or privileges the
authority, or the tenants or occupants have not paid, is prohibited from
charging, collecting, or receiving any privileges, except such sum or sums as
the authority, in its discretion, may hereafter agree to pay for the same. [L
2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next